cuneiform.lexd
PATTERNS
Initial
Initial? Medial+

LEXICON Initial
a:𒋡
á:𒋡
e:𒄿
é:𒄿
{eu}:𒄿
{eu'}:𒄿
i:𒆗
í:𒆗
y:𒆗
ý:𒆗
o:𒈨
ó:𒈨
u:𒈨
ú:𒈨

PATTERN Medial
Syl(1):Syl(2) [a:]
Syl(1):Syl(2) [á:]
Syl(1):Syl(3) [e:]
Syl(1):Syl(3) [é:]
Syl(1):Syl(3) [{eu}:]
Syl(1):Syl(3) [{eu'}:]
Syl(1):Syl(4) [i:]
Syl(1):Syl(4) [í:]
Syl(1):Syl(4) [y:]
Syl(1):Syl(4) [ý:]
Syl(1):Syl(5) [o:]
Syl(1):Syl(5) [ó:]
Syl(1):Syl(6) [u:]
Syl(1):Syl(6) [ú:]

LEXICON Syl(6)
p 𒁁 𒁇 𒄕 𒋾 𒉒
{mh} 𒁁 𒁇 𒄕 𒋾 𒉒
b 𒉼 𒁇 𒃲 𒁴 𒁷
m 𒉿 𒂟 𒑗 𒀽 𒀽
t 𒀺 𒅎 𒁑 𒅆 𒅆
{nh} 𒀺 𒅎 𒁑 𒅆 𒅆
d 𒆸 𒅂 𒁑 𒄑 𒅆
n 𒍭 𒁑 𒁑 𒀭 𒅆
s 𒁹 𒀝 𒀝 𒇺 𒇺
{ñh} 𒁹 𒀝 𒀝 𒇺 𒇺
z 𒌓 𒀸 𒄨 𒒃 𒒃
ñ 𒍝 𒍝 𒄨 𒋛 𒋛
k 𒑚 𒇥 𒈥 𒈧 𒑛
g 𒌋 𒇥 𒈥 𒉡 𒉡
{ng} 𒄰 𒇥 𒄥 𒄬 𒄬
' 𒋡 𒄿 𒆗 𒈨 𒈨
f 𒆯 𒆨 𒆯 𒉣 𒉣
{th} 𒁹 𒆩 𒆯 𒊮 𒊮
x 𒁲 𒂷 𒆯 𒁺 𒁺
w 𒉌 𒉌 𒆕 𒉌 𒆕
l 𒁍 𒆰 𒈪 𒁍 𒁍
j 𒉽 𒄿 𒆗 𒄞 𒃻
